New York, session 2025-2026, A10107.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 of section 632-a of the 2 executive law, as amended by chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (c) The office, upon receipt of notice of a contract, an agreement to 5 pay or payment of profits from a crime or funds of a convicted person 6 pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subdivision, or upon receipt of 7 notice of funds of a convicted person from the superintendent, sheriff 8 or municipal official of the facility where the incarcerated individual 9 or prisoner is confined pursuant to section one hundred sixteen or five 10 hundred-c of the correction law, shall notify all known crime victims of 11 the existence of such profits or funds at their last known address. 12 Upon receipt of notice pursuant to this paragraph, the office shall 13 immediately take such actions as are necessary to avoid the wasting of 14 the assets identified in such notice, in any manner consistent with 15 subdivision six of this section, until the expiration of all applicable 16 statutes of limitation for a crime victim to bring a civil action to 17 recover money or damages from such assets as described in subdivision 18 three of this section. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14475-01-6